Arkansas, session 2025, HB1232.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. REGULAR SALARIES - OPERATIONS. There is hereby established
for the Department of the Military for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the
following maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) SC011 SECRETARY OF THE MILITARY 1 GRADE SE05
(2) U132U ARK DEPUTY ADJUTANT GENERAL 1 GRADE SE03
(3) N253N DOM CHIEF OF STAFF 1 GRADE SE02
(4) L038C REGISTERED NURSE 1 GRADE MP01
(5) D022N IT SENIOR PROJECT MANAGER 2 GRADE IT09
(6) D040C GIS ANALYST 5 GRADE IT06
(7) D039C NETWORK SUPPORT SPECIALIST 2 GRADE IT06
*BSS013*
03-18-2025 17:24:02 BSS013

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 HB1232
(8) D022C SYSTEMS SPECIALIST 1 GRADE IT06
(9) D052C SOFTWARE SUPPORT ANALYST 1 GRADE IT05
(10) D058C COMPUTER OPERATIONS COORDINATOR 2 GRADE IT04
(11) D082C NETWORK ANALYST 2 GRADE IT04
(12) D064C WEBSITE DEVELOPER 1 GRADE IT04
(13) D071C COMPUTER SUPPORT ANALYST 2 GRADE IT03
(14) G319C DOM CHIEF LEGAL COUNSEL 1 GRADE GS14
(15) R055C DOM CHIEF OF HUMAN RESOURCES 1 GRADE GS13
(16) A023N MILITARY CHIEF FISCAL OFFICER 1 GRADE GS13
(17) R006C HUMAN RESOURCES ADMINISTRATOR 1 GRADE GS12
(18) G047C ATTORNEY SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS11
(19) A141C MILITARY FEDERAL BUDGET MANAGER 1 GRADE GS11
(20) V036C AGENCY PROCUREMENT ADMINISTRATOR 1 GRADE GS10
(21) S111C ASSET MAINTENANCE MANAGER 1 GRADE GS10
(22) T125C DOM CHIEF OF POLICE 2 GRADE GS10
(23) R056C DOM SENIOR BUDGET ANALYST 1 GRADE GS10
(24) X013C ENVIRONMENTAL HEALTH MANAGER 1 GRADE GS10
(25) M097C MILITARY YOUTH CHALLENGE PROGRAM DIR 1 GRADE GS10
(26) A052C ACCOUNTING COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS09
(27) A050C AGENCY FISCAL MANAGER 1 GRADE GS09
(28) S112C ITAM COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS09
(29) M009C LICENSED CERTIFIED SOCIAL WORKER 1 GRADE GS09
(30) S113C LRAM COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS09
(31) R050C MILITARY ASSISTANT HR ADMINISTRATOR 1 GRADE GS09
(32) M096C MILITARY YOUTH CHALLENGE PROGRAM MANAGER 1 GRADE GS09
(33) X038C QUALITY ASSURANCE MANAGER 1 GRADE GS09
(34) X225C SECURITY SYSTEMS COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS09
(35) A082C ACCOUNTANT II 1 GRADE GS08
(36) B067C ARCHAEOLOGIST 1 GRADE GS08
(37) R021C BUDGET ANALYST 1 GRADE GS08
(38) B024C CONSERVATION PROGRAM MANAGER 1 GRADE GS08
(39) B055C ECOLOGIST COORDINATOR 3 GRADE GS08
(40) E026C EDUCATION & INSTRUCTION COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS08
(41) S004C MAINTENANCE MANAGER 4 GRADE GS08
(42) P014C MUSEUM MANAGER 1 GRADE GS08
(43) A089C ACCOUNTANT I 3 GRADE GS07
03-18-2025 17:24:02 BSS013

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 HB1232
(44) B082C BIOLOGIST 2 GRADE GS07
(45) B054C CAMPUS CONSTRUCTION COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS07
(46) B065C ECOLOGIST 5 GRADE GS07
(47) E048C EDUCATION & INSTRUCTION SPECIALIST 5 GRADE GS07
(48) G148C ENERGY PROGRAM MANAGER 1 GRADE GS07
(49) C010C EXECUTIVE ASSISTANT TO THE DIRECTOR 1 GRADE GS07
(50) B080C FORESTER 1 GRADE GS07
(51) S017C MAINTENANCE COORDINATOR 4 GRADE GS07
(52) T043C MILITARY DEPUTY FIRE CHIEF 2 GRADE GS07
(53) T036C MILITARY FACILITIES SUPERVISOR 8 GRADE GS07
(54) P013C PUBLIC INFORMATION COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS07
(55) T124C PUBLIC SAFETY POLICE OFFICER SUPERVISOR 4 GRADE GS07
(56) E040C STAFF DEVELOPMENT COORDINATOR 2 GRADE GS07
(57) T111C TRAINING SUPPORT CENTER MANAGER 1 GRADE GS07
(58) C037C ADMINISTRATIVE ANALYST 9 GRADE GS06
(59) R027C BUDGET SPECIALIST 3 GRADE GS06
(60) G172C CAREER PLANNING & PLAC COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS06
(61) E044C CERTIFIED BACHELORS TEACHER 4 GRADE GS06
(62) S024C CONSTRUCTION/MAINTENANCE COORD 6 GRADE GS06
(63) E037C EDUCATION PROGRAM SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS06
(64) R030C EEO/GRIEVANCE OFFICER 1 GRADE GS06
(65) T068C FIRE DESK OPERATOR 9 GRADE GS06
(66) R025C HUMAN RESOURCES ANALYST 2 GRADE GS06
(67) B086C LAND MANAGEMENT SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS06
(68) L069C LICENSED PRACTICAL NURSE 1 GRADE GS06
(69) S033C MAINTENANCE SUPERVISOR 3 GRADE GS06
(70) T049C MILITARY FIREFIGHTER SHIFT LEADER 11 GRADE GS06
(71) B148C MILITARY NATURAL RESOURCE PROG COORD 1 GRADE GS06
(72) G166C MILITARY PROGRAM COORDINATOR 10 GRADE GS06
(73) P027C PUBLIC INFORMATION SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS06
(74) T123C PUBLIC SAFETY POLICE OFFICER 13 GRADE GS06
(75) S114C RTLA COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS06
(76) X226C SECURITY SYSTEMS ANALYST 1 GRADE GS06
(77) S022C SKILLED TRADES SUPERVISOR 10 GRADE GS06
(78) D074C TELECOMMUNICATIONS SUPERVISOR 2 GRADE GS06
(79) S021C WATER FILTER/WASTE DISPOSAL PLNT SUPV 1 GRADE GS06
03-18-2025 17:24:02 BSS013

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 HB1232
(80) M101C YOUTH PROGRAM TRAINING OFFICER II 5 GRADE GS06
(81) A088C ASSETS COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS05
(82) S025C BUILDING AND GROUNDS COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS05
(83) V014C BUYER 3 GRADE GS05
(84) G215C CAREER PLANNING & PLACEMENT SPEC 4 GRADE GS05
(85) T064C CIVIL AIR PATROL SVCS COORD 1 GRADE GS05
(86) T122C DOM SECURITY OFFICER 40 GRADE GS05
(87) B090C ENGINEER TECHNICIAN 1 GRADE GS05
(88) A091C FISCAL SUPPORT ANALYST 4 GRADE GS05
(89) R032C HUMAN RESOURCES PROGRAM REP 2 GRADE GS05
(90) C054C LOCAL OFFICE ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS05
(91) M056C MILITARY HOUSING MANAGER 1 GRADE GS05
(92) A090C PAYROLL SERVICES SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS05
(93) S069C RADIO DISPATCH OPERATOR 12 GRADE GS05
(94) T060C SENIOR MILITARY FIREFIGHTER 25 GRADE GS05
(95) S031C SKILLED TRADESMAN 33 GRADE GS05
(96) S038C TRANSIT OPERATIONS SUPERVISOR 1 GRADE GS05
(97) V018C WAREHOUSE MANAGER 3 GRADE GS05
(98) S030C WATER FILTER/WASTE DISPOSAL PLNT OPER 1 GRADE GS05
(99) M060C YOUTH PROGRAM COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS05
(100) M102C YOUTH PROGRAM TRAINING OFFICER I 28 GRADE GS05
(101) C056C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST III 9 GRADE GS04
(102) S040C CALIBRATION TECHNICIAN 2 GRADE GS04
(103) S110C CUSTODIAN PROFESSIONAL SUPERVISOR 2 GRADE GS04
(104) V020C INVENTORY CONTROL MANAGER 1 GRADE GS04
(105) S047C LANDSCAPE SUPERVISOR 1 GRADE GS04
(106) S046C MAINTENANCE TECHNICIAN 35 GRADE GS04
(107) T066C MILITARY FIREFIGHTER 43 GRADE GS04
(108) P048C MULTI-MEDIA SPECIALIST 4 GRADE GS04
(109) X152C REAL PROPERTY MANAGEMENT SPECIALIST 4 GRADE GS04
(110) T072C SECURITY OFFICER SUPERVISOR 1 GRADE GS04
(111) V025C WAREHOUSE SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS04
(112) C073C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST II 4 GRADE GS03
(113) S109C CUSTODIAN PROFESSIONAL 27 GRADE GS03
(114) C070C DUPLICATION ASSISTANT 1 GRADE GS03
(115) V027C INVENTORY CONTROL TECHNICIAN 1 GRADE GS03
03-18-2025 17:24:02 BSS013

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 HB1232
(116) S050C MAINTENANCE SPECIALIST 5 GRADE GS03
(117) C087C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST I 1 GRADE GS02
(118) S060C HEAVY EQUIPMENT OPERATOR 7 GRADE GS02
(119) S084C INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES SUPERVISOR 1 GRADE GS02
(120) S087C INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES ASSISTANT 2 GRADE GS01
(121) S065C MAINTENANCE ASSISTANT 4 GRADE GS01
(122) D029C SENIOR GIS ANALYST 1 GRADE IT07
(123) B045C BIOLOGIST SUPERVISOR 1 GRADE GS09
(124) X054C ENVIRONMENTAL PROGRAM COORDINATOR 2 GRADE GS07
(125) S098C CONSTRUCTION SUPERVISOR 1 GRADE GS06
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 458

SECTION 2. EXTRA HELP. There is hereby authorized, for the Department
of the Military for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number
of part-time or temporary employees, to be known as "Extra Help", payable
from funds appropriated herein for such purposes: one hundred twenty-seven
(127) temporary or part-time employees, when needed, at rates of pay not to
exceed those provided in the Uniform Classification and Compensation Act, or
its successor, or this act for the appropriate classification.

SECTION 3. APPROPRIATION - GENERAL OPERATIONS. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of the Military, to be payable from the
Department of the Military Fund Account, for personal services and operating
expenses of the Department of the Military for the fiscal year ending June
30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $3,561,053
(02) EXTRA HELP 56,500
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 1,332,041
(04) OVERTIME 100
(05) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 3,370,314
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 25,000
(C) PROF. FEES 100,000
03-18-2025 17:24:02 BSS013

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 HB1232
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 225,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(06) CIVIL AIR PATROL PERSONAL SERVICES
AND OPERATING EXPENSES 75,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $8,745,008

SECTION 4. APPROPRIATION - MILITARY CALL-UP AND COURT MARTIAL. There
is hereby appropriated, to the Department of the Military, to be payable from
the Department of the Military Fund Account, for emergency Military Call-Up
and Military Court Marital Expenses for the Department of the Military for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) EMERGENCY CALL UP $2,500,000
(02) COURT MARTIAL EXPENSES 20,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $2,520,000

SECTION 5. APPROPRIATION - NATIONAL GUARD MUSEUM. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of the Military, to be payable from the
Department of the Military Fund Account, for personal services and operating
expenses of the Department of the Military - National Guard Museum for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $107,004
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 40,815
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 18,014
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 1,163
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $166,996

03-18-2025 17:24:02 BSS013

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 HB1232
SECTION 6. APPROPRIATION - FORT CHAFFEE. There is hereby appropriated,
to the Department of the Military, to be payable from the federal funds as
designated by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for personal services
and operating expenses of the Department of the Military - Fort Chaffee for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $4,195,557
(02) EXTRA HELP 159,408
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 1,828,979
(04) OVERTIME 125,000
(05) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 25,025,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 30,000
(C) PROF. FEES 4,000,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 4,000,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $39,363,944

SECTION 7. APPROPRIATION - FEDERAL TRANING SITE OPERATIONS. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Department of the Military, to be payable from
the federal funds as designated by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for
personal services and operating expenses of the Department of the Military -
Federal Training Site Operations for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $12,169,594
(02) EXTRA HELP 720,928
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 5,233,532
(04) OVERTIME 300,000
(05) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 28,800,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 100,000
03-18-2025 17:24:02 BSS013

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 HB1232
(C) PROF. FEES 5,000,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 3,000,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0

TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $55,324,054

SECTION 8. APPROPRIATION - CASH OPERATIONS. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of the Military, to be payable from the cash
fund deposited in the State Treasury as determined by the Chief Fiscal
Officer of the State, for operating expenses of the Department of the
Military for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE $337,810
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 7,500
(C) PROF. FEES 20,500
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 320,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $685,810

SECTION 9. APPROPRIATION - COUNTER DRUG ASSET FORFEITURE PROGRAM -
CASH. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of the Military, to be
payable from the cash fund deposited in the State Treasury as determined by
the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for counter drug program expenses of
the Department of the Military for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) COUNTER DRUG ASSET FORFEITURE $160,311

SECTION 10. APPROPRIATION - MILITARY SUPPORT REVOLVING. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Department of the Military, to be payable from
the Military Support Revolving Fund, for vehicle insurance, supplies,
03-18-2025 17:24:02 BSS013

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 HB1232
rations, fuel, personnel services, allowances, equipment leases, various
active duty status, operational support and related operating expenses of the
Department of the Military for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) NON-EMERGENCY CALL-UP EXPENSES $219,632

SECTION 11. APPROPRIATION - MILITARY FAMILY RELIEF TRUST FUND. There
is hereby appropriated, to the Department of the Military, to be payable from
the Military Family Relief Trust Fund, for Military Family Relief Grant
Program of the Department of the Military - Military Family Relief Trust Fund
for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MILITARY FAMILY RELIEF GRANT PROGRAM $72,757

SECTION 12. APPROPRIATION - FT. CHAFFEE READINESS CENTER. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Department of the Military, to be payable from
the federal funds as designated by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for
construction expenses of the Department of the Military - Ft. Chaffee
Readiness Center for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) CONSTRUCTION $3,135,470

SECTION 13. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
GENERALS SALARY. The line item maximums for the State of Arkansas Adjutant
General and Deputy Adjutant General are based on the salary grid by the
United States Department of Defense. Incumbents in these positions shall be
compensated in accordance with the Department of Defense Advisory Service Pay
Plan and are not guaranteed placement at the maximum level. The line item
03-18-2025 17:24:02 BSS013

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 HB1232
maximum salaries may be adjusted on July 1 of each fiscal year to incorporate
salary rate changes that have been implemented by the U.S. Department of
Defense.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 14. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
PROMOTIONAL ITEMS. The State Military Department is hereby authorized to
transfer appropriation from Operating Expenses to Promotional Items in the
General Operations Appropriation and/or Cash Operations Appropriation
provided by this Act in an amount not to exceed ten thousand dollars
($10,000) each fiscal year, as authorized by the Director of State Resources,
and with the approval of the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 15. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
CARRY FORWARD OF FUNDS.
(a) The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall cause to be transferred
on his or her books and those of the State Treasurer and Auditor of State the
balance of funds remaining in the Department of Military Fund Account on June
30, 2025 2026 into a sub-fund created within the Department of Military Fund
to be used exclusively for construction, maintenance and operating expenses
or for future construction projects of the State Military Department.
(b) Any carry forward of unexpended balance of funding as authorized
herein, may be carried forward under the following conditions:
(1) The Office of Budget of the Department of Finance and
Administration shall report to the Legislative Council all amounts carried
forward by the September meeting of the Legislative Council or the Joint
Budget Committee meeting which report shall include the name of the agency,
board, commission, or institution and the amount of funding carried forward,
the program name or line item and the funding source; and
(2) The State Military Department shall provide a written report
to the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee containing all
03-18-2025 17:24:02 BSS013

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 HB1232
information set forth in subdivision (b)(1) of this section no later than
thirty (30) days prior to the time the Department presents its budget request
to the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee, or both; and
(3) Thereupon, the Department of Finance and Administration shall
include all information obtained in subdivision (b)(2) of this section in the
budget manuals.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July
1, 2024 2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 16. COMPLIANCE WITH OTHER LAWS. Disbursement of funds
authorized by this act shall be limited to the appropriation for such agency
and funds made available by law for the support of such appropriations; and
the restrictions of the State Procurement Law, the General Accounting and
Budgetary Procedures Law, the Revenue Stabilization Law, the Regular Salary
Procedures and Restrictions Act, or their successors, and other fiscal
control laws of this State, where applicable, and regulations promulgated by
the Department of Finance and Administration, as authorized by law, shall be
strictly complied with in disbursement of said funds.

SECTION 17. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General
Assembly that any funds disbursed under the authority of the appropriations
contained in this act shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for
which this act was adopted, as evidenced by the Agency Requests, Executive
Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the budget
manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration, letters, or
summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and adoption.

SECTION 18. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits
the appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the
effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2025 is essential to the operation of
the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in
the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the
effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2025 could work irreparable harm
upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental
03-18-2025 17:24:02 BSS013

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 HB1232
programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act
being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health
and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2025.

/s/Joint Budget Committee































03-18-2025 17:24:02 BSS013